Utah statutes.
26A-1-108.   Jurisdiction and duties of local departments.

A local health department has jurisdiction in all unincorporated and incorporated areas of the county or  counties in which it is established and shall enforce state health laws, Department of Health, Department of Environmental Quality, and local health department rules, regulations, and standards within those areas.

